District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “Balancing Educational Investments Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 45 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-4503(o) is amended to read as follows:
“(o)(1) The Chief Financial Officer shall promulgate regulations establishing the maximum
account contribution limit and prevent contributions on behalf of a designated beneficiary in excess
of the amount determined by actuarial estimates necessary to pay qualified higher education
expenses. Any amount in excess of the amount necessary to pay qualified higher education

expenses shall be promptly withdrawn in a nonqualified withdrawal or transferred to another
account.
“(2) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and no later than by July 1 of every 5 years
thereafter, the Chief Financial Officer shall revise the maximum account contribution limit and
make adjustments according to actuarial estimates necessary to pay qualified education expenses.
The Chief Financial Officer shall publish the actuarial estimates underlying the revisions to the
maximum account contribution limit on its website. Any maximum account contribution limit
increase shall be adjusted to the nearest multiple of $1,000. The actuarial estimates review shall
consider the following when revising the maximum account contribution limit:
“(A)(i) The product of 7 times the average of one year’s undergraduate total
direct charges at the 10 most expensive regional 4-year eligible educational institutions as measured
and last published by the College Board’s Independent College 500 Index that have the largest total
direct charges.
“(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “total direct charges”
means the charges determined for each eligible educational institution including reported tuition,
fees, room and board for an on-campus student at the eligible educational institution; and
“(B) Financing limitations set by the federal government and availability of
financial assistance.”.
Sec. 3. Financial impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as provided
in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).